Florida, session 2026, SB1434.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 50 51 Section 1.âSection 163.2525, Florida Statutes, is created 52 to read: 53 163.2525âInfill Redevelopment Act.â 54 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âInfill 55 Redevelopment Act.â 56 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.âThe Legislature finds that this 57 stateâs urban areas lack sufficient land for the development of 58 additional residential uses, which has led to a shortage of 59 supply; that parcels of land within or near urban areas are 60 difficult to develop or redevelop because of environmental 61 issues and local regulations; and that facilitating the 62 expedited permitting of such parcels, particularly in areas in 63 which multiple local governments have jurisdiction, serves 64 important public interests in remediating environmentally 65 challenged land and increasing the supply of housing. 66 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 67 (a)ââAdjacent toâ means located next to another parcel of 68 land or portion thereof, including where the parcels are 69 separated only by a roadway, railroad, or other public or 70 private right-of-way or easement. 71 (b)ââDensityâ has the same meaning as in s. 163.3164. 72 (c)ââDesignated agricultural landâ means a parcel of land 73 within a zoning district that allows for agricultural uses such 74 as farming, raising livestock, or aquaculture as the main 75 permitted uses and which land is classified as agricultural land 76 under s. 193.461. 77 (d)ââEnvironmentally impacted landâ means a parcel of land: 78 1.âUpon any portion of which a contaminant or pollutant has 79 been detected above the applicable local, state, or federal 80 residential cleanup target levels from Phase II environmental 81 site assessment activities; or 82 2.âAny portion of which is located in a brownfield area 83 designated pursuant to s. 376.80. 84 (e)ââLocal governmentâ means a county, municipality, 85 special district, or political subdivision of the state. 86 (f)ââParcel of landâ has the same meaning as in s. 87 163.3164. 88 (g)ââQualifying parcelâ means a parcel of land to which 89 this section applies under subsection (4). 90 (h)ââRecreational facilitiesâ means one or more parcels of 91 land any portion of which was previously used as a golf course, 92 tennis court, swimming pool, or clubhouse, or another similar 93 use. 94 (i)ââTownhouseâ means a single-family dwelling unit that is 95 constructed in a series or group of attached units with property 96 lines separating such units. 97 (j)ââUrban growth boundaryâ means a boundary established by 98 a comprehensive plan or land development regulation beyond which 99 the provision of urban services or facilities is limited. The 100 term includes, but is not limited to, urban development 101 boundaries and urban service boundaries. 102 (4)âQUALIFYING PARCELS.â 103 (a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), this section 104 applies to environmentally impacted land consisting of at least 105 5 acres adjacent to a parcel of land within the same 106 jurisdiction which is zoned for residential uses as of right and 107 which is within a county that meets both of the following 108 requirements: 109 1.âThe county has a population of more than 1.475 million 110 people according to the most recent decennial census. 111 2.âThere are at least 15 municipalities within the county. 112 (b)âThis section does not apply to any of the following: 113 1.âDesignated agricultural land. 114 2.âLand owned or operated by a local government for public 115 park purposes. 116 3.âLand outside an urban growth boundary. 117 4.âLand within one-quarter mile of a military installation 118 identified in s. 163.3175(2). 119 5.âLand that is owned, or that was owned at any time within 120 the 15 years preceding the effective date of this act, by a 121 public utility as defined in s. 366.02. 122 (5)âDEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS.âNotwithstanding any local law, 123 ordinance, or regulation, a local government shall permit a 124 qualifying parcel to be developed with residential uses. To 125 ensure compatibility with the character of the local community, 126 the density of development authorized under this section may not 127 exceed the average density of all zoning districts within the 128 same jurisdiction which are applicable to parcels adjacent to 129 the qualifying parcel and which allow residential uses as of 130 right or 25 dwelling units per acre, whichever is lower. The 131 intensity of development must comply with the standards 132 applicable to any parcel adjacent to the qualifying parcel. 133 (6)âSUBDIVISION APPROVAL.âA local government must 134 administratively approve an application for the subdivision of a 135 qualifying parcel if the application satisfies the requirements 136 of chapter 177. A local government may not use the subdivision 137 process to restrict development below the density and intensity 138 authorized under subsection (5). 139 (7)âBUFFER FROM RESIDENTIAL USES.âIf a qualifying parcel is 140 adjacent to single-family homes or townhouses on all sides, the 141 developer must provide a buffer of at least 20 feet between the 142 new development and the single-family homes or townhouses. The 143 buffer area must be measured from lot line to lot line and must 144 be maintained as open space or improved with passive 145 recreational facilities accessible to the community. For 146 purposes of this subsection, swales and water retention areas 147 are considered open space. 148 (8)âRECREATIONAL FACILITIES.â 149 (a)âIf a qualifying parcel includes recreational facilities 150 or areas reserved for recreational use and such recreational 151 facilities or areas are adjacent to single-family homes on all 152 sides, the developer must do all of the following: 153 1.âEstablish that such facilities or areas, or portions 154 thereof, located on the qualifying parcel have not been in 155 operation or in use for a period of at least 12 consecutive 156 months. 157 2.âPay double the applicable parks or recreational 158 facilities impact fee that would otherwise apply to the proposed 159 development, to compensate for the loss of open or recreational 160 space. 161 3.âProvide written notice delivered by certified mail to 162 all owners of property adjacent to the recreational facilities 163 or areas, which notice includes all of the following 164 information: 165 a.âThat the developer intends to develop the parcel in 166 accordance with this section. 167 b.âThat the adjacent property owners may elect to purchase 168 the parcel or portion thereof containing recreational facilities 169 or areas for the purpose of maintaining the parcel, or portions 170 thereof, as recreational areas or open space within 90 days 171 after the date the notice is mailed. 172 c.âThe price at which the adjacent property owners may 173 purchase the property. 174 (b)âProperty owners who receive the notice required under 175 subparagraph (a)3. and wish to exercise the option to purchase 176 the parcel or portion thereof containing the recreational 177 facilities or areas must exercise the option and close on the 178 property, and accept a deed restriction or record a restrictive 179 covenant requiring the property to be maintained as a 180 recreational area or open space for at least 30 years, within 90 181 days after the notice is mailed or forfeit the option. The 182 parcel or portion thereof must be offered to such property 183 owners for purchase at a price that may not exceed the greater 184 of: 185 1.âAn amount equal to the price paid by the property owner 186 plus 10 percent; or 187 2.âAn amount equal to a bona fide offer to purchase the 188 property received by the property owner within the last 12 189 months. 190 (9)âDEVELOPMENT APPLICATIONS.âThe proposed development of a 191 qualifying parcel which complies with the requirements of this 192 section must be administratively approved, and no further action 193 by the governing body of a local government is required. 194 However, a local government may administratively require a 195 proposed development to comply with local regulations relating 196 to architectural design if review by a board is not required and 197 if such regulations would apply, and are generally applicable, 198 to comparable residential development within the jurisdiction 199 and do not limit the density or intensity of development below 200 that authorized by this section. A developer must establish 201 consistency with applicable concurrency requirements at such 202 time as local regulations would require for a comparable 203 residential development within its jurisdiction. Each local 204 government shall maintain on its website a policy containing 205 procedures and expectations for administrative approval under 206 this subsection. 207 (10)âAPPLICATION, PREEMPTION, AND CONSTRUCTION.âThis 208 section applies to development applications submitted pursuant 209 to this section on or after the effective date of this act. A 210 local government may not adopt or enforce a local law, an 211 ordinance, or a regulation that restricts, prohibits, or 212 otherwise limits the development of a qualifying parcel in 213 accordance with this section. This section shall be liberally 214 construed to effectuate its intent. 215 Section 2.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 216 replace the phrase âthe effective date of this actâ wherever it 217 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law. 218 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.